Mississippi, session 2026, HB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-13-80, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-80. (1)  There is created the Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation within the State Department of Education.  The office shall be responsible for the administration of a statewide * * *dropout prevention program success and graduation of students. (2) The State Superintendent of Public Education shall appoint a director for the Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation, who shall meet all qualifications established by the State Superintendent of Public Education and the State Personnel Board.  The director shall be responsible for the proper administration of the Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation and any other regulations or policies that may be adopted by the State Board of Education.  * * *However, if for any reason within the two‑year period beginning July 1, 2014, a new director for the Office of Dropout Prevention is employed by the department, the employment of such individual shall not be subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, except as otherwise provided in Section 25‑9‑127(4). (3) Each school district shall implement a * * *dropout prevention program approved by the Office of Dropout Prevention of the State Department of Education by the 2012‑2013 Student Success and Graduation Strategic Plan, which shall be submitted to the Office of Student Success and Graduation of the State Department of Education by July 15, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and annually thereafter * * *, school year. (4) Each local school district will be held responsible for reducing and/or eliminating dropouts in the district.  The local school district will be responsible for the implementation of * * *dropout strategic plans focusing on issues such as, but not limited to: (a) Dropout Prevention initiatives that focus on the needs of individual local education agencies; (b) Establishing policies and procedures that meet the needs of the districts; (c) Focusing on the student-centered goals and objectives that are * * *measureable measurable; (d) Strong emphasis on reducing the retention rates in grades kindergarten, first and second; (e) Targeting subgroups that need additional assistance to meet graduation requirements; and (f) Dropout recovery initiatives that focus on students age seventeen (17) through twenty-one (21), who dropped out of school. (5) (a)  The Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation may provide technical assistance * * *upon written request by the to local school districts to increase graduation rates and reduce chronic absenteeism, as defined in Section 37-13-91(n).  The Office of * * *Dropout Prevention will Student Success and Graduation shall collaborate with program offices within the * * *Mississippi State Department of Education to develop and * * *implement policies and initiatives to reduce the state's dropout rate disseminate model policies, templates and data tools for: (i) Early warning identification; (ii) Tiered interventions; and (iii) Family and community engagement strategies aligned to Section 37-13-91(n). (b) The Office of Student Success and Graduation shall, at a minimum: (i) Publish annually updated guidance and model plans; and (ii) Offer training and technical assistance to schools and local school districts whose chronic absenteeism rate exceeds ten percent (10%) for any grade level or subgroup. (6) Each school district's * * *dropout prevention strategic plan shall address how students will transition to the home school district from the juvenile detention centers. (7) It is the intent of the Legislature that, through the statewide * * *dropout prevention program and the dropout prevention Student Success and Graduation programs implemented by each school district, the graduation rate for cohort classes will be increased to not less than * * *eighty‑five percent (85%) ninety percent (90%) by the * * *2018‑2019 2029-2030 school year.  * * *The Office of Dropout Prevention shall establish graduation rate benchmarks for each two‑year period from the 2008‑2009 school year through the 2018‑2019 school year, which shall serve as guidelines for increasing the graduation rate for cohort classes on a systematic basis to eighty‑five percent (85%) by the 2018‑2019 school year. SECTION 2.  Section 37-13-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-81. There is created the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation within the Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation of the State Department of Education.  The office shall be responsible for the administration of a statewide system of enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law, outlined in Section 37-13-91, and for the supervision of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches throughout the state. SECTION 3.  Section 37-13-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-83. The State Superintendent of Public Education shall appoint * * *a director for the Office of Compulsory School Attendance appropriate staff to adequately provide enforcement, who shall meet all qualifications established for * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators and any additional qualifications that may be established by the State Superintendent of Public Education or State Personnel Board.  The * * *director staff shall be responsible for the proper administration of the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation in conformity with the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law and any other regulations or policies that may be adopted by the State Board of Education.  The * * *director staff shall report directly to the Director of the Office of * * *Dropout Prevention Student Success and Graduation. SECTION 4.  Section 37-13-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-85. The Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation shall have the following powers and duties, in addition to all others imposed or granted by law: (a) To establish any policies or guidelines concerning the employment of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches which serve to effectuate a uniform system of enforcement under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law throughout the state, and to designate the number of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches which shall be employed to serve in each school district area; (b) To supervise and assist * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators in the performance of their duties; (c) To establish minimum standards for enrollment and attendance for the state and each individual school district, and to monitor the success of the state and districts in achieving the required levels of performance; (d) To provide to school districts failing to meet the established standards for enrollment and attendance assistance in reducing absenteeism or the dropout rates in those districts; (e) To establish any qualifications, in addition to those required under Section 37-13-89, for * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches as the office deems necessary to further the purposes of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; (f) To develop and implement a system under which school districts are required to maintain accurate records that document enrollment and attendance in such a manner that the records reflect all changes in enrollment and attendance, and to require * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches to submit information concerning public school attendance on a monthly basis to the office; (g) To prepare the form of the certificate of enrollment required under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law and to furnish a sufficient number of the certificates of enrollment to each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach in the state; (h) To provide to the State Board of Education statistical information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems as requested by the State Board of Education; (i) To provide for the certification of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches; (j) To provide for a course of training and education for * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches, and to require successful completion of the course as a prerequisite to certification by the office as * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches; (k) To adopt any guidelines or policies the office deems necessary to effectuate an orderly transition from the supervision of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches by district attorneys to the supervision by the * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators; * * *(l)  Beginning on July 1, 1998, to require school attendance officer supervisors to employ persons employed by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, as school attendance officers without requiring such persons to submit an application or interview for employment with the State Department of Education; ( * * *ml)  To adopt policies or guidelines linking the duties of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches to the appropriate courts, law enforcement agencies and community service providers; and ( * * *nm)  To adopt any other policies or guidelines that the office deems necessary for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, the policies or guidelines shall not add to or contradict with the requirements of Section 37-13-91. SECTION 5.  Section 37-13-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-87. (1)  The * * *Director appropriate staff member of the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation shall employ three (3) * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators, each to maintain an office within a different Supreme Court district.  Each * * *supervisor regional coordinator shall be responsible for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law within his or her district and shall exercise direct supervision over the * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches in the district.  The * * *supervisors regional coordinators, who shall report to the director of the office, shall assist the * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches in the performance of their duties as established by law or otherwise. (2) No person having less than eight (8) years combined actual experience as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach, school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field, and/or social worker in the state shall be employed as a * * *school attendance officer supervisor student success and graduation regional coordinator.  Further, a * * *school attendance officer supervisor student success and graduation regional coordinator shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches before January 1, 1987.  * * *School attendance officers Effective July 1, 2026, student success and graduation coaches shall meet any additional qualifications established by the State Personnel Board for * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches or * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators.  The * * *school attendance officer supervisors student success and graduation regional coordinators shall receive an annual salary to be set by the State Superintendent of Public Education, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. (3) To establish clear compliance within schools and school districts, the State Department of Education may employ up to ten (10) attendance compliance officers to assist with proper data implementation, collection and training of appropriate district and school level staff members.  These individuals shall have monitoring duties as assigned by the State Department of Education. SECTION 6.  Section 37-13-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-89. (1)  In each school district within the state, there shall be employed the number of * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches determined by the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation * * *to be necessary to adequately enforce the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, this number shall not exceed * * *one hundred fifty‑three (153) school attendance officers one hundred eighty (180) student success and graduation coaches at any time.  In any school districts where charter schools operate, the home school district's student success and graduation coach shall also enforce the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law for those charter schools.  From and after July 1, 1998, all * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches employed pursuant to this section shall be employees of the State Department of Education.  * * *The State Department of Education shall employ all persons employed as school attendance officers by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, and shall assign them to school attendance responsibilities in the school district in which they were employed before July 1, 1998.  The first twelve (12) months of employment for each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall be the probationary period of state service. (2) (a)  The State Department of Education shall obtain current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks on all persons applying for the position of * * *school attendance officer after July 2, 2002 student success and graduation coach.  The criminal records information and registry checks must be kept on file for any new hires.  In order to determine an applicant's suitability for employment as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach, the applicant must be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history record check.  * * *The applicant shall pay the fee, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check; however, the State Department of Education, in its discretion, may pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check on behalf of any applicant. Under no circumstances may a member of the State Board of Education, employee of the State Department of Education or any person other than the subject of the criminal records background check disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this subsection. (b) If the fingerprinting or criminal records check discloses a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the applicant is not eligible to be employed as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach.  Any employment of an applicant pending the results of the fingerprinting and criminal records check is voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal records check.  However, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may allow an applicant aggrieved by an employment decision under this subsection to appear before the board, or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the new hire to be employed as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach.  The State Board of Education may grant waivers for mitigating circumstances, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to:  (i) age at which the crime was committed; (ii) circumstances surrounding the crime; (iii) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (iv) work history; (v) current employment and character references; and (vi) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the responsibilities of a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children. (c) A member of the State Board of Education or employee of the State Department of Education may not be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this section. (3) (a)  Each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall possess * * *a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have no less than three (3) years combined actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree, and/or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Personnel Board for the position of school attendance officer at least one (1) of the following: (i) An education pathway, which consists of the following: 1. A bachelor's degree with a major in behavioral science or related field, including, but not limited to, social work, education, criminal justice, psychology or sociology; or 2. An associate's degree with a major in behavioral science or related field, plus two (2) years of full-time experience in education, social work, counseling, law enforcement or a comparable field involving direct services to children and families; or (ii) An experience pathway, which requires no less than three (3) years of combined experience in a related role involving student support and engagement. (b) All student success and graduation coaches shall also satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Department of Education for the position of student success and graduation coach. (4) It shall be the duty of each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach to: (a) Cooperate with any public agency to locate and identify all compulsory-school-age children who are not attending school; (b) Cooperate with all courts of competent jurisdiction; (c) Investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children not enrolled in a nonpublic school; (d) Provide appropriate counseling to encourage all school-age children to attend school until they have completed high school; (e) Attempt to secure the provision of social or welfare services that may be required to enable any child to attend school; (f) Contact the home or place of residence of a compulsory-school-age child and any other place in which the officer is likely to find any compulsory-school-age child when the child is absent from school during school hours without a valid written excuse from school officials, and when the child is found, the officer shall notify the parents and school officials as to where the child was physically located.  If a home visit is necessary, the school district may send a member of the administrative staff or local law enforcement agency to accompany the student success and graduation coach to the residence of the absent child; (g) Contact promptly the home of each compulsory-school-age child in the school district within the * * *officer's student success and graduation coach's jurisdiction who is not enrolled in school or is not in attendance at public school and is without a valid written excuse from school officials; if no valid reason is found for the nonenrollment or absence from the school, the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall give written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance; (h) Collect and maintain information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems, as may be required by law or the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation; and (i) Perform all other duties relating to compulsory school attendance established by the State Department of Education or the local school district * * *school staff responsible for attendance * * *supervisor, or both. (5) While engaged in the performance of his or her duties, each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall carry on his or her person a badge identifying him or her as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach under the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation of the State Department of Education and an identification card designed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and issued by the * * *school attendance officer supervisor student success and graduation regional coordinator.  Neither the badge nor the identification card shall bear the name of any elected public official. (6) In collaboration with the State Department of Education, the State Personnel Board shall develop a salary scale for * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches as part of the variable compensation plan.  The various pay ranges of the salary scale shall be based upon factors including, but not limited to, education, professional certification and licensure, and number of years of experience.  * * *School attendance officers Student success and graduation coaches shall be paid in accordance with this salary scale. The minimum salaries under the scale shall be no less than the following: * * *  (a)  For school attendance officers holding a bachelor's degree or any other attendance officer who does not hold such a degree, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience     Salary 0 ‑ 4 years   $24,528.29 5 ‑ 8 years 26,485.29 9 ‑ 12 years 28,050.89 13 ‑ 16 years 29,616.49 Over 17 years 31,182.09 (b)  For school attendance officers holding a license as a social worker, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience     Salary 0 ‑ 4 years   $25,558.29 5 ‑ 8 years 27,927.29 9 ‑ 12 years 29,822.49 13 ‑ 16 years 31,717.69 17 ‑ 20 years 33,612.89 Over 21 years 35,415.39 (c)  For school attendance officers holding a master's degree in a behavioral science or a related field, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience     Salary 0 ‑ 4 years   $26,382.29 5 ‑ 8 years 29,008.79 9 ‑ 12 years 31,109.99 13 ‑ 16 years 33,211.19 17 ‑ 20 years 35,312.39 Over 21 years 37,413.59 2026-2027 AND SUBSEQUENT SCHOOL YEARS MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE Exp.        Salary 0         $32,000.00 1         $32,592.40 2         $33,237.54 3         $33,870.84 4         $34,514.02 5         $35,718.87 6         $36,388.25 7         $37,068.01 8         $37,758.28 9         $38,459.21 10        $39,753.42 11        $40,482.50 12        $41,222.77 13        $41,974.39 14        $42,737.51 15        $44,127.33 16        $45,491.91 17        $45,726.11 18        $46,543.79 19        $47,373.88 20        $48,865.93 21        $49,728.47 22        $50,604.03 23        $51,492.79 24        $52,394.93 25        $55,110.54 26        $56,059.69 27        $57,023.02 28        $58,000.71 29        $58,992.97 30        $60,000.00 (7) (a)  Each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach employed by a district attorney on June 30, 1998, who became an employee of the State Department of Education on July 1, 1998, shall be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave for his or her continuous service as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach under the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for personal leave shall be in an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum personal leave the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach could have accumulated had he or she been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-93 during his or her employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for major medical leave shall be in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the maximum major medical leave the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach could have accumulated had he or she been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-95 during his or her employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. However, if a district attorney who employed a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach on June 30, 1998, certifies, in writing, to the State Department of Education that the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach had accumulated, pursuant to a personal leave policy or major medical leave policy lawfully adopted by the district attorney, a number of days of unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, which is greater than the number of days to which the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach is entitled under this paragraph, the State Department of Education shall authorize the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach to retain the actual unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, certified by the district attorney, subject to the maximum amount of personal leave and major medical leave the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. (b) For the purpose of determining the accrual rate for personal leave under Section 25-3-93 and major medical leave under Section 25-3-95, the State Department of Education shall give consideration to all continuous service rendered by a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach before July 1, 1998, in addition to the service rendered by the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach as an employee of the department. (c) In order for a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach to be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave or to retain the actual unused personal leave and major medical leave accumulated by him or her before July 1, 1998, the district attorney who employed the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach must certify, in writing, to the State Department of Education the hire date of the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach.  For each * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach employed by the youth or family court or a state agency before being designated an employee of the district attorney who has not had a break in continuous service, the hire date shall be the date that the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach was hired by the youth or family court or state agency.  The department shall prescribe the date by which the certification must be received by the department and shall provide written notice to all district attorneys of the certification requirement and the date by which the certification must be received. (8) (a)  * * *School attendance officers Student success and graduation coaches shall maintain regular office hours on a year-round basis; however, during the school term, on those days that teachers in all of the school districts served by a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach are not required to report to work, the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach also shall not be required to report to work.  (For purposes of this subsection, a school district's school term is that period of time identified as the school term in contracts entered into by the district with licensed personnel.)  A * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall be required to report to work on any day recognized as an official state holiday if teachers in any school district served by that * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach are required to report to work on that day, regardless of the school attendance officer's status as an employee of the State Department of Education, and compensatory leave may not be awarded to the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach for working during that day.  However, a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach may be allowed by the school attendance officer's supervisor to use earned leave on such days. (b) The State Department of Education annually shall designate a period of * * *six (6) four (4) consecutive weeks * * *in during the summer between school years during which * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches shall fall wholly within the window beginning on the Monday of the second full week of June and ending on the Sunday of the third full week of July (the summer nonreporting period), during which student success and graduation coaches shall not be required to report to work.  A * * * school attendance officer student success and graduation coach who elects to work * * *at any time during * * *that the summer nonreporting period * * *may shall not be awarded compensatory leave for such work and may not * * *opt elect to be absent from work at any time * * *other than during the six (6) weeks designated by the department unless the school attendance officer uses outside the summer nonreporting period except by use of accrued personal leave or major medical leave accrued under Sections 25-3-93 or 25-3-95 * * * for such absence. (9) The State Department of Education shall provide all continuing education and training courses that * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches are required to complete under state law or rules and regulations of the department. SECTION 7.  Section 37-13-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-91. (1)  This section shall be referred to as the "Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law." (2) The following terms as used in this section are defined as follows: (a) "Parent" means the father or mother to whom a child has been born, or the father or mother by whom a child has been legally adopted. (b) "Guardian" means a guardian of the person of a child, other than a parent, who is legally appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction. (c) "Custodian" means any person having the present care or custody of a child, other than a parent or guardian of the child. (d) "School day" means * * *not less than five and one‑half (5‑1/2) and not more than eight (8) hours of actual teaching in which both teachers and pupils are in regular attendance for scheduled schoolwork the portion of a day during which schools are in session as set by the local school board and consistent with State Board of Education accreditation requirements. For purposes of compulsory school attendance and chronic absenteeism, a pupil shall be considered in full-day attendance if present for at least sixty-six percent (66%) of the day, as defined by the State Board of Education. (e) "School" means any public school, including a charter school, in this state or any nonpublic school in this state which is in session each school year for at least one hundred eighty (180) school days, except that the "nonpublic" school term shall be the number of days that each school shall require for promotion from grade to grade. (f) "Compulsory-school-age child" means a child who has attained or will attain the age of six (6) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year and who has not attained the age of seventeen (17) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year; and shall include any child who has attained or will attain the age of five (5) years on or before September 1 and has enrolled in a full-day public school kindergarten program. (g) "School attendance officer" means a person employed by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 37-13-89. (h) "Appropriate school official" means the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, or, in the case of a nonpublic school, the principal or the headmaster. (i) "Nonpublic school" means an institution for the teaching of children, consisting of a physical plant, whether owned or leased, including a home, instructional staff members and students, and which is in session each school year.  This definition shall include, but not be limited to, private, church, parochial and home instruction programs. (3) A parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child in this state shall cause the child to enroll in and attend a public school or legitimate nonpublic school for the period of time that the child is of compulsory school age, except under the following circumstances: (a) When a compulsory-school-age child is physically, mentally or emotionally incapable of attending school as determined by the appropriate school official based upon sufficient medical documentation. (b) When a compulsory-school-age child is enrolled in and pursuing a course of special education, remedial education or education for children with physical or mental disadvantages or disabilities. (c) When a compulsory-school-age child is being educated in a legitimate home instruction program. The parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child described in this subsection * * *, or the parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory‑school‑age child attending any charter school or nonpublic school, or shall complete a "certification of enrollment" to facilitate the administration of this section.  The appropriate school official for any or all children attending a charter school or nonpublic school shall complete a "certificate of enrollment"  * * *in order to facilitate the administration of this section. The form of the certificate of enrollment shall be prepared by the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation of the State Department of Education and shall be designed to obtain the following information only: (i) The name, address, telephone number and date of birth of the compulsory-school-age child; (ii) The name, address and telephone number of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child; (iii) The local public school district where the compulsory-school-age child resides; ( * * *iiiiv)  A simple description of the type of education the compulsory-school-age child is receiving and, if the child is enrolled in a nonpublic school, the name and address of the school; and ( * * *ivv)  The signature of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child or, for any or all compulsory-school-age child or children attending a charter school or nonpublic school, the signature of the appropriate school official and the date signed. The certificate of enrollment shall be returned to the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach where the child resides on or before * * *September August 15 of each year.  Any parent, guardian or custodian found by the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach to be in noncompliance with this section shall comply, after written notice of the noncompliance by the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach, with this subsection within ten (10) days after the notice or be in violation of this section.  However, in the event the child has been enrolled in a public school within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day of the school year as required in subsection (6), the parent or custodian may, at a later date, enroll the child in a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program and send the certificate of enrollment to the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach and be in compliance with this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program shall be those not operated or instituted for the purpose of avoiding or circumventing the compulsory attendance law. (4) An "unlawful absence" is an absence for an entire school day or during part of a school day by a compulsory-school-age child, which absence is not due to a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance.  For purposes of reporting absenteeism under subsection (6) of this section, if a compulsory-school-age child has an absence that is more than * * *thirty‑seven percent (37%) thirty-three percent (33%) of the instructional day, as fixed by the school board for the school at which the compulsory-school-age child is enrolled, the child must be considered absent the entire school day.  Days missed from school due to disciplinary suspension shall not be considered an "excused" absence under this section.  This subsection shall not apply to children enrolled in a nonpublic school. Each of the following shall constitute a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance of a compulsory-school-age child enrolled in a noncharter public school, provided satisfactory evidence of the excuse is provided to the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee: (a) An absence is excused when the absence results from the compulsory-school-age child's attendance at an authorized school activity with the prior approval of the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee. These activities may include field trips, athletic contests, student conventions, musical festivals and any similar activity. (b) An absence is excused when the absence results from illness or injury which prevents the compulsory-school-age child from being physically able to attend school.  However, after three (3) written notes per semester, medical documentation is required to be considered an excused absence. (c) An absence is excused when isolation of a compulsory-school-age child is ordered by the county health officer, by the State Board of Health or appropriate school official. (d) An absence is excused when it results from the death or serious illness of a member of the immediate family of a compulsory-school-age child.  The immediate family members of a compulsory-school-age child shall include children, spouse, grandparents, parents, brothers and sisters, including stepbrothers and stepsisters. (e) An absence is excused when it results from a medical or dental appointment of a compulsory-school-age child with a documented excuse from the medical provider. (f) An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory-school-age child at the proceedings of a court or an administrative tribunal if the child is a party to the action or under subpoena as a witness. (g) An absence may be excused if the religion to which the compulsory-school-age child or the child's parents adheres, requires or suggests the observance of a religious event.  The approval of the absence is within the discretion of the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, but approval should be granted unless the religion's observance is of such duration as to interfere with the education of the child. (h) An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, that the purpose of the absence is to take advantage of a valid educational opportunity such as travel, including vacations or other family travel.  Approval of the absence must be gained from the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, before the absence * * *, but the approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. (i) An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, that conditions are sufficient to warrant the compulsory-school-age child's nonattendance.  However, no absences shall be excused by the school district superintendent, or his or her designee, when any student suspensions or expulsions circumvent the intent and spirit of the compulsory attendance law. (j) An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory-school-age child participating in official organized events sponsored by the 4-H or Future Farmers of America (FFA).  The excuse for the 4-H or FFA event must be provided in writing to the appropriate school superintendent by the Extension Agent or High School Agricultural Instructor/FFA Advisor. (k)  An absence is excused when it results from the compulsory-school-age child officially being employed to serve as a page at the State Capitol for the Mississippi House of Representatives or Senate. (l) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no compulsory-school-age child shall be granted more than five (5) excused absences per semester under subsections (b) through (j). Any additional excused absences beyond this limit must be specifically approved by the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, upon a showing of extenuating circumstances.  Extenuating circumstances may include, but are not limited to, prolonged illness or injury supported by medical documentation, extended religious observances or participation in educational opportunities of substantial merit, including out-of-state educational travel.  Any absence in excess of this limit, and not approved by the superintendent, shall be considered unexcused for purposes of this chapter.  Any absence in excess of the limit set forth in this subsection, and not approved by the superintendent, shall be considered an unexcused absence for purposes of this chapter. (m) For purposes of this section and in alignment with state and federal accountability requirements, a compulsory-school-age child shall be considered chronically absent if the child is absent from school for ten percent (10%) or more of the instructional days in a school year, regardless of whether such absences are excused or unexcused under paragraphs (a) through (l) of this subsection.  Accordingly, each school district shall: (i) Actively monitor chronic absenteeism rates by school, grade level and subgroup of students.  Districts shall include chronic absenteeism data in their annual accountability reporting and in their district-and school-level improvement plans; (ii) Develop and implement tiered intervention strategies for students identified as being at risk of chronic absenteeism, which shall include, at a minimum: 1. Timely parent or guardian notification when a student has accumulated three (3) or more absences that place the student at risk of chronic absenteeism; 2. Opportunities for parent or guardian conferences to identify barriers to regular attendance; 3. Referral to school-or community-based support services as appropriate, including health, counseling, and transportation resources; and 4. Assignment of an individualized attendance success plan, which may include mentoring, case management by a school attendance officer, or other evidence-based supports; (iii) Adopt strategies for proactive family engagement to prevent and reduce chronic absenteeism, including, but not limited to: 1. Regular communication with families in a language and manner understandable to them about the importance of daily attendance and the consequences of absenteeism; 2. Partnering with community organizations, faith-based institutions, or local businesses to support families in overcoming barriers to school attendance; and 3. Providing training for school staff on culturally responsive family engagement practices related to attendance; (iv) When a school's chronic absenteeism rate exceeds ten percent (10%) for any subgroup or grade level, the school district shall be required to adopt a written chronic absenteeism reduction plan, which shall be submitted to the local school board and made publicly available on the district website.  The plan shall describe specific evidence-based practices the district will employ to reduce chronic absenteeism, the timeline for implementation, family and community engagement strategies, and the metrics for measuring progress; (v) The State Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to districts in the development and implementation of chronic absenteeism reduction strategies and shall annually publish statewide data on chronic absenteeism by district and school; and (vi) The reporting of chronic absenteeism under this subsection shall not be construed to create a new criminal offense or to redefine "unlawful absence," but shall serve as a primary indicator for prevention, intervention, and accountability under state and federal law. (n) By July 1, 2026, each school district shall, by board action, adopt and implement locally tailored policies that: (i) Set documentation standards for excuses under paragraphs (b) and (e), including acceptable verification, submission timelines, a locally set limit on parent/guardian notes before third-party documentation is required, and protections for student privacy; and (ii) Establish family-engagement protocols aligned to paragraph (n), including timely notice when a student is at risk of chronic absenteeism, a parent/guardian conference and attendance success plan, multi-channel/translated communications, and referral to available local supports. (o) Policies shall be posted on the district website, reviewed at least every three (3) years, and reported on annually to the local board using disaggregated attendance data.  The department may issue nonbinding model policies, and adoption of the model or a substantially aligned policy, constitutes minimum compliance. (p) Nothing in this subsection creates a new criminal offense or redefines "unlawful absence." (5) Any parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child subject to this section who refuses or willfully fails to perform any of the duties imposed upon him or her under this section or who intentionally falsifies any information required to be contained in a certificate of enrollment, shall be guilty of contributing to the neglect of a child and, upon conviction, shall be punished in accordance with Section 97-5-39. Upon prosecution of a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child for violation of this section, the presentation of evidence by the prosecutor that shows that the child has not been enrolled in school within * * *eighteen (18) ten (10) calendar days after the first day of the school year of the public school which the child is eligible to attend, or that the child has accumulated * * *twelve (12) eight (8) unlawful absences during the school year at the public school in which the child has been enrolled, shall establish a prima facie case that the child's parent, guardian or custodian is responsible for the absences and has refused or willfully failed to perform the duties imposed upon him or her under this section. However, no proceedings under this section shall be brought against a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child unless the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach has contacted promptly the home of the child and has provided written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance. (6) If a compulsory-school-age child has not been enrolled in a school * * *within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day by the close of business on August 15 of the school year of the school which the child is eligible to attend or the child has accumulated five (5) unlawful absences during the school year of the public school in which the child is enrolled, the school district superintendent, or his or her designee, shall report, within two (2) school days * * *or within five (5) calendar days, whichever is less, the absences to the school attendance officer to the student success and graduation coach.  The State Department of Education shall prescribe a uniform method for schools to utilize in reporting the unlawful absences to the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach.  The superintendent, or his or her designee, also shall report any student suspensions or student expulsions to the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach when they occur. (7) When a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach has made all attempts to secure enrollment and/or attendance of a compulsory-school-age child and is unable to effect the enrollment and/or attendance, the * * *attendance officer shall student success and graduation coach may file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or shall file a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child.  After eight (8) unlawful absences or failure to engage with an attendance plan, the student success and graduation coach shall file a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child.  Sheriffs, deputy sheriffs and municipal law enforcement officers shall be fully authorized to investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children, and shall be authorized to file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or file a petition or information in the court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child for violation of this section.  The youth court shall expedite a hearing to make an appropriate adjudication and a disposition to ensure compliance with the Compulsory School Attendance Law, and may order the child to enroll or re-enroll in school.  The superintendent of the school district to which the child is ordered may assign, in his or her discretion, the child to the alternative school program of the school established pursuant to Section 37-13-92. (8) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of reprimanding any school superintendents who fail to timely report unexcused absences under the provisions of this section. (9) Notwithstanding any provision or implication herein to the contrary, it is not the intention of this section to impair the primary right and the obligation of the parent or parents, or person or persons in loco parentis to a child, to choose the proper education and training for such child, and nothing in this section shall ever be construed to grant, by implication or otherwise, to the State of Mississippi, any of its officers, agencies or subdivisions any right or authority to control, manage, supervise or make any suggestion as to the control, management or supervision of any private or parochial school or institution for the education or training of children, of any kind whatsoever that is not a public school according to the laws of this state; and this section shall never be construed so as to grant, by implication or otherwise, any right or authority to any state agency or other entity to control, manage, supervise, provide for or affect the operation, management, program, curriculum, admissions policy or discipline of any such school or home instruction program. SECTION 8.  Section 37-13-92, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-92. (1)  Beginning with the school year 2004-2005, the school boards of all school districts shall establish, maintain and operate, in connection with the regular programs of the school district, an alternative school program or behavior modification program as defined by the State Board of Education for, but not limited to, the following categories of compulsory-school-age students: (a) Any compulsory-school-age child who has been suspended for more than ten (10) days or expelled from school, except for any student expelled for possession of a weapon or other felonious conduct; (b) Any compulsory-school-age child referred to such alternative school based upon a documented need for placement in the alternative school program by the parent, legal guardian or custodian of such child due to disciplinary problems; (c) Any compulsory-school-age child referred to such alternative school program by the dispositive order of a chancellor or youth court judge, with the consent of the superintendent of the child's school district; (d) Any compulsory-school-age child whose presence in the classroom, in the determination of the school superintendent or principal, is a disruption to the educational environment of the school or a detriment to the interest and welfare of the students and teachers of such class as a whole; and (e)  No school district is required to place a child returning from out-of-home placement in the mental health, juvenile justice or foster care system in alternative school. Placement of a child in the alternative school shall be done consistently, and for students identified under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), shall adhere to the requirements of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004.  If a school district chooses to place a child in alternative school the district will make an individual assessment and evaluation of that child in the following time periods: (i)  Five (5) days for a child transitioning from a group home, mental health care system, and/or the custody of the Department of Human Services, Division of Youth and Family Services; (ii)  Ten (10) days for a child transitioning from a dispositional placement order by a youth court pursuant to Section 43-21-605; and (iii) An individualized assessment for youth transitioning from out-of-home placement to the alternative school shall include: 1. A strength needs assessment. 2. A determination of the child's academic strengths and deficiencies. 3. A proposed plan for transitioning the child to a regular education placement at the earliest possible date. (2) The principal or program administrator of any such alternative school program shall require verification from the appropriate guidance counselor of any such child referred to the alternative school program regarding the suitability of such child for attendance at the alternative school program.  Before a student may be removed to an alternative school education program, the superintendent of the student's school district must determine that the written and distributed disciplinary policy of the local district is being followed.  The policy shall include standards for: (a) The removal of a student to an alternative education program that will include a process of educational review to develop the student's individual instruction plan and the evaluation at regular intervals of the student's educational progress; the process shall include classroom teachers and/or other appropriate professional personnel, as defined in the district policy, to ensure a continuing educational program for the removed student; (b) The duration of alternative placement; and (c) The notification of parents or guardians, and their appropriate inclusion in the removal and evaluation process, as defined in the district policy.  Nothing in this paragraph should be defined in a manner to circumvent the principal's or the superintendent's authority to remove a student to alternative education. (3) The local school board or the superintendent shall provide for the continuing education of a student who has been removed to an alternative school program. (4) A school district, in its discretion, may provide a program of High School Equivalency Diploma preparatory instruction in the alternative school program.  However, any High School Equivalency Diploma preparation program offered in an alternative school program must be administered in compliance with the rules and regulations established for such programs under Sections 37-35-1 through 37-35-11 and by the Mississippi Community College Board.  The school district may administer the High School Equivalency Diploma Testing Program under the policies and guidelines of the Testing Service of the American Council on Education in the alternative school program or may authorize the test to be administered through the community/junior college district in which the alternative school is situated. (5) Any such alternative school program operated under the authority of this section shall meet all appropriate accreditation requirements of the State Department of Education. (6) The alternative school program may be held within such school district or may be operated by two (2) or more adjacent school districts, pursuant to a contract approved by the State Board of Education.  When two (2) or more school districts contract to operate an alternative school program, the school board of a district designated to be the lead district shall serve as the governing board of the alternative school program.  Transportation for students attending the alternative school program shall be the responsibility of the local school district.  The expense of establishing, maintaining and operating such alternative school program may be paid from funds contributed or otherwise made available to the school district for such purpose or from local district maintenance funds. (7) The State Board of Education shall promulgate minimum guidelines for alternative school programs.  The guidelines shall require, at a minimum, the formulation of an individual instruction plan for each student referred to the alternative school program and, upon a determination that it is in a student's best interest for that student to receive High School Equivalency Diploma preparatory instruction, that the local school board assign the student to a High School Equivalency Diploma preparatory program established under subsection (4) of this section.  The minimum guidelines for alternative school programs shall also require the following components: (a) Clear guidelines and procedures for placement of students into alternative education programs which at a minimum shall prescribe due process procedures for disciplinary and High School Equivalency Diploma placement; (b) Clear and consistent goals for students and parents; (c) Curricula addressing cultural and learning style differences; (d) Direct supervision of all activities on a closed campus; (e) Attendance requirements that allow for educational and workforce development opportunities; (f) Selection of program from options provided by the local school district, Division of Youth Services or the youth court, including transfer to a community-based alternative school; (g) Continual monitoring and evaluation and formalized passage from one (1) step or program to another; (h) A motivated and culturally diverse staff; (i) Counseling for parents and students; (j) Administrative and community support for the program; and (k) Clear procedures for annual alternative school program review and evaluation. (8) On request of a school district, the State Department of Education shall provide the district informational material on developing an alternative school program that takes into consideration size, wealth and existing facilities in determining a program best suited to a district. (9) Any compulsory-school-age child who becomes involved in any criminal or violent behavior shall be removed from such alternative school program and, if probable cause exists, a case shall be referred to the youth court. (10) The State Board of Education shall promulgate guidelines for alternative school programs which provide broad authority to school boards of local school districts to establish alternative education programs to meet the specific needs of the school district. (11) Each school district having an alternative school program shall submit a report by July 31 of each calendar year to the State Department of Education describing the results of its annual alternative school program review and evaluation undertaken pursuant to subsection (7)(k).  The report shall include a detailed account of any actions taken by the school district during the previous year to comply with substantive guidelines promulgated by the State Board of Education under subsection (7)(a) through (j).  In the report to be implemented under this section, the State Department of Education shall prescribe the appropriate measures on school districts that fail to file the annual report.  The report should be made available online via the department's website to ensure transparency, accountability and efficiency. SECTION 9.  Section 37-13-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-107. (1)  Every * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach shall be required annually to attend and complete a comprehensive course of training and education which is provided or approved by the Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation of the State Department of Education.  Attendance shall be required beginning with the first training seminar conducted after the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach is employed as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach. (2) The Office of * * *Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement Educational Participation shall provide or approve a course of training and education for * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches of the state.  The course shall consist of at least twelve (12) hours of training per year.  The content of the course of training and when and where it is to be conducted shall be approved by the office.  A certificate of completion shall be furnished by the State Department of Education to those * * *school attendance officers student success and graduation coaches who complete the course.  Each certificate shall be made a permanent record of the * * *school attendance officer supervisor's student success and graduation regional coordinator's office where the * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach is employed. (3) Upon the failure of any person employed as a * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach to receive the certificate of completion from the State Department of Education within the first year of his or her employment, the person shall not be allowed to carry out any of the duties of * * *school attendance officer student success and graduation coach and shall not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which the certificate has not been obtained. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.